District of Columbia statutes.
3-603

Statement of authority.

The authority of the Council to establish a Boxing and Wrestling Commission is granted in subsections (a) and (b) of § 1-204.04.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 4, 23 DCR 1807
1973 Ed., § 2-1233.
1981 Ed., § 2-603.